Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 13.1 Actions Against the State on Highway and Public Works Contracts

37-13.1-1.
Suits allowed — Jurisdiction — Statute of limitations — Procedure.

Any person, firm, or corporation which is awarded a contract subsequent to July 1, 1977, with the state of Rhode Island, acting through any of its departments, commissions, or other agencies, for the design, construction, repair, or alteration of any state highway, bridge, or public works other than those contracts which are covered by the public works arbitration act may, in the event of any disputed claims under the contract, bring an action against the state of Rhode Island in the superior court for Providence county for the purpose of having the claims determined, provided notice of the general nature of the claims shall have been given in writing to the department administering the contract in accordance with the contract specifications set forth for the specific contract. No action shall be brought under this section later than one year from the date of the acceptance of the work by the agency head as so evidenced; provided, however, that no action shall be brought under this section on any contract awarded prior to July 1, 1977. Acceptance of an amount offered as final payment shall preclude any person, firm, or corporation from bringing a claim under this section. The action shall be tried to the court without a jury. All legal defenses except governmental immunity shall be reserved to the state. Any action brought under this section shall be privileged in respect to assignment for trial upon motion of either party.

Any party bringing an action under this section shall be entitled to an award of prejudgment interest beginning with the filing date of such court action. Said interest shall be computed daily to the date of payment and shall be compounded annually. Interest shall be calculated as follows:

Where the period for which interest is owed does not exceed one year, interest shall be calculated for such period at an annual rate equal to the weekly average one year constant maturity treasury yield, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, for the calendar week preceding the filing date of the court action under this section.

Where the period for which interest is owed is more than one year, interest for the first year shall be calculated in accordance with subdivision (1) of this section and interest for each additional year shall be calculated on the combined amount of the principal and accrued interest at an annual rate equal to the weekly average one year constant maturity treasury yield, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, for the calendar week preceding the beginning of each additional year.

In the event the one year constant maturity treasury yield is converted to a different standard reference base or otherwise revised, the determination of interest shall be made with the use of such converted or revised standard reference base. In the event the board of governors of the federal reserve system ceases to publish a converted or revised rate, interest shall be calculated at a rate published by the United States Treasury Department, or other comparable entity, that establishes a rate reflecting or best approximating the market conditions for one year investments at the time of the taking and each additional year that interest is owed pursuant to subdivision (2) above.

Any action brought under this section shall, upon motion of either party, be given priority for expedited hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 449, § 1.

37-13.1-2.
Actions by contractor on behalf of subcontractor.

Any person, firm or corporation awarded the contract, subsequent to July 1, 2006, with the state of Rhode Island, acting through any of its departments, commissions or other agencies, for the design, construction, repair or alteration of any state highway or bridge, may, on behalf of a subcontractor of any tier under the contractor, bring an action against the state of Rhode Island regarding a claim arising out of or relating to labor, materials, or services provided by the subcontractor to the contractor pursuant to a contract between the subcontractor and the contractor for the same project that is the subject of the contract between the contractor and the state of Rhode Island.

In any action brought by a contractor against the state of Rhode Island under subsection (a) of this section, so long as the contractor retains liability to the subcontractor related to the subject matter of the claim, it shall not be a defense that: (i) the costs and damages at issue were incurred by a subcontractor and that subcontractor has not been paid for these costs and damages; or (ii) the contractor’s obligation to pay costs and damages to the subcontractor is conditional upon a recovery against the state of Rhode Island; or (iii) the contractor has not acknowledged or admitted the contractor’s liability to the subcontractor.

In any action brought by a contractor against the state of Rhode Island under subsection (a) of this section, the action is subject to all legal and equitable defenses of the state of Rhode Island against the contractor.

This section applies to all such actions brought in Superior Court under §

37-13.1-1

and to claims arbitrated pursuant to §

37-16-1

, et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 468, § 1.